Lang_Hungarian/resources/hunmorph/ocamorph/test/hu_HU.aff
SFX K Y 5
SFX K 0 ettünk . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX K 0 ettél . <PAST><PERS<2>>>  
SFX K 0 ettek . <PAST><PLUR>>  
SFX K 0 ettetek . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX K 0 ettem . <PAST><PERS<1>>>  

SFX D Y 3
SFX D 0 el [sz] <PERS<2>>>  
SFX D 0 em . <PERS<1>>>  
SFX D 0 ek . <PERS<1>>>informal  

SFX I Y 1
SFX I 0 etek . <PERS<2>><PLUR>>  

SFX v Y 209
SFX v 0 juk [^sz] <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zák [^ds]z <PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jál [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 jjam [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jam [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sam tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sam [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssam [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v z dzam dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v z szam sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v zt szam szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sam s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jak j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v 0 sak s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v t ssa [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jak [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v z dzuk dz <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z szuk sz <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zanak [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 suk s <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jon j <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v 0 son s <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v z dzátok dz <PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z szátok sz <PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sátok s <PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 juk [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zuk [^ds]z <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jon [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v 0 jjad [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 jad [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 sad tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 sad [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v t ssad [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v z dzad dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v z szad sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v zt szad szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 sad s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 za [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zátok [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssuk [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zak [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v t ssatok [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 jjatok [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 satok tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 satok [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v t ssatok [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v z dzatok dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v z szatok sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v t ssalak [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v zt szatok szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 jjanak [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 sanak tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 sanak [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v t ssanak [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v z dzanak dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v z szanak sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v zt szanak szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v t ssátok [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 za [^ds]z <DEF>>  
SFX v 0 janak j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 sanak s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 ja [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v t sd [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zon [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v 0 dd [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v t sd [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v z zd dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v z zd sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v zt zd szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 d s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jék [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v z dza dz <DEF>>  
SFX v z sza sz <DEF>>  
SFX v t ssam [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssak [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v 0 jjak [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v 0 jék j <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v 0 sék s <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v 0 sak tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v 0 sak [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v t ssak [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v z dzak dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v z szak sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v zt szak szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX v 0 sák s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v t sson [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v 0 jjon [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v 0 son tát <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v 0 son [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v t sson [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v z dzon dz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v z szon sz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v zt szon szt <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX v t ssad [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 zék [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v 0 játok [^sz] <PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssanak [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 jál j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 sál s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 zad [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 játok [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zunk [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 zam [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 ják [^sz] <PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zátok [^ds]z <PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jad [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX v 0 jj [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v 0 s tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v 0 s [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v t ssunk [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v t ss [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v z dz dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v z sz sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v zt sz szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v 0 jjunk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 j j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v 0 s s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v 0 sunk tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 sunk [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v t ssunk [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v z dzunk dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v z szunk sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v zt szunk szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v z dzák dz <PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z szák sz <PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 junk j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 sunk s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 jam [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sák s <PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssék [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v 0 jjék [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v 0 sék tát <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v 0 sék [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v t ssék [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v z dzék dz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v z szék sz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v zt szék szt <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX v 0 sa [^z]s <DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jatok [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v t ssák [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jják [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 ják [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sák tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sák [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssák [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z dzák dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z szák sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v zt szák szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zuk [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zák [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jja [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 ja [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sa tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sa [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssa [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v z dza dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v z sza sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v zt sza szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sa s <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 junk [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 d [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zalak [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v 0 ja [^sz] <DEF>>  
SFX v 0 j [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v 0 ják [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 zatok [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 d [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssál [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 jjál [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 zál [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 sál tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 sál [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v t ssál [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v z dzál dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 jalak [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v z szál sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v zt szál szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX v 0 jjuk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 juk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 suk tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 suk [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssuk [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z dzuk dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z szuk sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v zt szuk szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 suk s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 jatok j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 satok s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX v 0 jjalak [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v 0 jalak [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v 0 salak tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v 0 salak [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v t ssalak [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v z dzalak dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v z szalak sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v zt szalak szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v 0 jjátok [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 játok [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sátok tát <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 sátok [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v t ssátok [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z dzátok dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v z szátok sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v zt szátok szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 salak s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX v 0 sátok s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX v 0 z [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v t ss [ls][áó]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX v 0 janak [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  

SFX E Y 7
SFX E 0 ötték . <PAST><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX E 0 ötte . <PAST><DEF>>  
SFX E 0 öttük . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX E 0 öttelek . <PAST><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX E 0 öttem . <PAST><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX E 0 ötted . <PAST><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX E 0 öttétek . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
